Utah statutes.
23-20-15.   Destruction of signs or inclosure on private land unlawful.
It is unlawful for any person, without the consent of the owner or person in
charge of any privately owned land, to tear down, mutilate, or destroy any
sign, signboard or other notice which regulates trespassing for purposes of
hunting, trapping, or fishing on this land; or to, without such consent, tear
down, deface, or destroy any fence or other inclosure on this privately owned
land, or any gate or bars belonging to any such fence or inclosure.
